Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.055

Pacific daylight time. (Contingent effective date.)

(1) The time of the state of Washington and all of its political subdivisions is Pacific daylight time throughout the calendar year, as determined by reference to coordinated universal time.

(2) Pacific daylight time within the state is that of the fifth zone designated by federal law as Pacific Standard Time, 15 U.S.C. Secs. 261 and 263, advanced by one hour.

[ 2019 c 297 s 2.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—2019 c 297: "(1) Sections 2 through 4 of this at [act] take effect on the first Sunday in November following the effective date of federal authorization to observe daylight saving time year-round, except if the effective date of federal authorization to observe daylight saving time year-round occurs on or after October 1st but before the first Sunday in November, sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect on the first Sunday in November in the following year.

(2) The governor shall provide written notice of the effective date of sections 2 through 4 of this act to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the governor." [ 2019 c 297 s 5.]